turkverbs.lexc
!!!turkverbs.lexc!!!

LEXICON Root

yazmVk #;
yazılmVk #;
burmVk #;
burulmVk #;
giymVk #;
giyinmVk #;
sevişmVk #;
görünmVk #;
görüşmVk #;
öpüşmVk #;
doğmVk #;
doğurmVk #;
batmVk #;
pişmVk #; 
pişirmVk #;
geҫmVk #;
düşmVk #;
tutmVk #;
